Tennessee, session 114, HB1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 5, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
49-5-304.
(a) Due to the considerable amount of training requirements in state law for
educators, school personnel, and volunteers at LEAs and public charter schools, the
following is a non-exhaustive, non-binding, informative list of the training requirements
and opportunities established in state law:
(1) The following statutes reference annual training:
(A) Section 49-5-1007 for the teacher code of ethics;
(B) Section 49-6-321(a) for a full-time employee to receive
seizure safety and first aid training;
(C) Section 49-6-805(7) for teachers and other school personnel
to receive school safety training;
(D) Section 49-6-815(b)(1)(E) for faculty or staff members
carrying a handgun on school grounds to receive training in school
policing;
(E) Section 49-6-816(d)(1)(D) for employees carrying a concealed
handgun on school property;
HB1732
010446
- 1 -

(F) Section 49-6-1901 for LEA employees to receive suicide
prevention training;
(G) Section 49-6-2116(b) for transportation supervisors;
(H) Section 49-6-3601(b)(1) for coaches to complete certain
training on concussion recognition, and other head injuries, and on
sudden cardiac arrest;
(I) Section 49-6-3601(b)(2)(C) for certain coaches to receive heat
illness and other environmental conditions training;
(J) Section 49-6-4217(b) for school resource officers to complete
training in school policing;
(K) Section 49-50-1602(b) for certain school personnel to
administer glucagon and insulin;
(L) Section 49-50-1602(d)(3) for school nurses to be educated in
diabetes care; and
(M) Section 49-50-1602(g)(4) for volunteer staff to administer
anti-seizure medication;
(2) The following statutes reference triennial training:
(A) Section 49-6-819(b) for teachers, administrators, and other
school personnel to receive de-escalation training;
(B) Section 49-6-1601(b) and Section 37-1-408 for all school
officials and employees working directly with students to complete a child
abuse training program;
(C) Section 49-6-3004(c)(1)(B) for employees of an LEA who
work directly with students to receive training on the detection,
intervention, prevention, and treatment of human trafficking; and
- 2 - 010446

(D) Section 49-6-4503(c)(1) for teachers and counselors on the
employing LEA's policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation, bullying, or
cyberbullying;
(3) The following statutes reference trainings that must be completed
before a person may perform certain acts:
(A) Section 49-50-1603(e) for persons who seek to administer
medications to treat adrenal insufficiency;
(B) Sections 49-2-122(c)(3)(E) and 49-2-122(d) for members of a
cardiac emergency response team and others on the severity of sudden
cardiac arrest events and AEDs;
(C) Section 49-2-137(b)(3) for LEA employees on how to use a
bleeding control kit;
(D) Section 49-3-114(c)(3) for certain LEAs on how to budget to
increase student achievement;
(E) Section 49-6-1103 for science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM) leadership training in STEM innovation hubs;
(F) Section 49-6-1601(c)(2) for child abuse coordinators;
(G) Section 49-6-2116(b) for transportation supervisors to
complete a student transportation management training program;
(H) Section 49-6-2701(c)(1) for threat assessment teams;
(I) Section 49-6-3601(b)(1)(C) for coaches to receive training in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and the use of an automated
external defibrillator (AED);
(J) Section 49-6-4212 for school administrators conducting
certain searches;
- 3 - 010446

(K) Section 49-6-4213(h) for principals and teachers authorized to
test students for drugs;
(L) Section 49-6-4217(b) for school resource officers to
participate in forty (40) hours of basic training in school policing;
(M) Section 49-6-816(d)(1)(C) for employees of distressed rural
counties to carry a concealed weapon; and
(N) Section 49-6-2107(g) for school bus drivers to complete a
school bus driver training program; and
(4) The following statutes reference training opportunities:
(A) Section 49-2-122(j) for school bus drivers to receive training in
CPR, first aid, and AEDs;
(B) Section 49-1-215 for teachers on attention deficit disorder and
hyperactivity;
(C) Section 49-1-223 for teachers, athletic coaches, and athletes
to participate in an asthma treatment training;
(D) Section 49-1-230 for school personnel to participate in
adverse childhood experiences training;
(E) Section 49-5-414 for certain individuals to receive training to
in emergency first aid and CPR;
(F) Section 49-6-3601(b)(3) for coaches to annually complete
training in physical conditions and in the use of training equipment;
(G) Section 49-10-1304(j) for certain individuals to receive
behavior intervention training; and
(H) Section 49-50-1802(c)(1) for certain individuals to receive
antisemitism awareness training.
- 4 - 010446

(b) This section does not exempt any individual from having to comply with a
training requirement established in or pursuant to the laws of this state, nor does it
repeal or amend any training opportunity, that are not referenced in this section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-215, is amended by adding the
following at the end of the section:
The training in this section is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-223, is amended by designating
the current language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) The training in this section is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-230, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) The training in subsection (b) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-122, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(k) The trainings in subdivision (c)(3)(E) and subsections (d) and (j) are included
in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-137, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) The training in subdivision (b)(3) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-
304.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-114(c)(3), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
The training in this subdivision (c)(3) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-1007, is amended by adding
the following at the end of the section:
- 5 - 010446

The training in this section is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-321(a), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (a) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-805, is amended by
designating the current language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) The training in subdivision (a)(7) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-
304.
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-815, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(l) The training in subdivision (b)(1)(E) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-
304.
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-816, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(l) The trainings in subdivisions (d)(1)(C) and (d)(1)(D) are included in the list
compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-819(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) Each LEA and public charter school shall ensure that each teacher,
administrator, and other school personnel employed by the LEA or public charter school
receives de-escalation training created pursuant to subsection (a) within the first year of
employment and every three (3) years thereafter. The training in this subsection (b) is
included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
- 6 - 010446

SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1601(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) Each LEA and each public charter school shall ensure that all school officials
and employees working directly with students of the respective LEA or public charter
school complete the child abuse training program required in § 37-1-408 within the first
year of employment and once every three (3) years thereafter. The training in this
subsection (b) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-408(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) Each LEA and each public charter school shall ensure that employees
working directly with students of the respective LEA or public charter school complete a
child abuse training program identified by the department of education pursuant to
subsection (a), or a training program that meets the guidelines established by the
department of children's services pursuant to subsection (a), as part of the employee's
in-service training within the first year of employment and once every three (3) years
thereafter. Each LEA and each public charter school shall report its compliance with this
section to the department of education. The training in this subsection (b) is included in
the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1103, is amended by adding
the following at the end of the section:
The training in this section is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1601(c), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(8) The training in subdivision (c)(2) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
- 7 - 010446

SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1901, is amended by adding
the following at the end of the section:
The training in this section is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2107(g), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (g) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2116(b), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (b) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2701, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(g) The training in subdivision (c)(1) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3004(c)(1)(B), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
The training in this subdivision (c)(1)(B) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3601(b), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(4) The training in this subsection (b) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-
304.
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4212(a)(3), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
The training in this subdivision (a)(3) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 25. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4213(h), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (h) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
- 8 - 010446

SECTION 26. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4217(b), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (b) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 27. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4503(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1)
(A) Each LEA shall, at the beginning of each school year, provide
teachers and school counselors a copy of the policy along with information on the
policy's implementation, bullying prevention and strategies to address bullying
and harassment when it happens.
(B) Each LEA shall provide training to teachers and counselors regarding
the policy and appropriate procedures relative to implementation of the policy
within the first year of employment and once every three (3) years thereafter.
The department of education shall provide guidelines for such training and
provide recommendations of appropriate, available and free bullying and
harassment prevention resources. The training in this subdivision (c)(1)(B) is
included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 28. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1304, is amended by adding
the following at as a new subsection:
(k) The training in subsection (j) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 29. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1602(b), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (b) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 30. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1602(d)(3), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
- 9 - 010446

The training in this subdivision (d)(3) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 31. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1602(g)(4), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
The training in this subdivision (g)(4) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 32. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1603(e), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subsection:
The training in this subsection (e) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 33. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1802, is amended by adding
the following at as a new subsection:
(e) The training in subdivision (c)(1) is included in the list compiled in § 49-5-304.
SECTION 34. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 10 - 010446